test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-lex_njune_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - saje: # ok NJUNE
    saje+N+Sg+Nom:  saˊj̣e
    saje+N+Sg+Gen:  saˊje
    saje+N+Sg+Acc:  saˊje
    saje+N+Sg+Ill:  saˊj̣an
    saje+N+Sg+Loc:  saajeest
    saje+N+Sg+Com:  [soijijn, soojijn] #also soijijn  # Matti Morottajain tärhistum
    saje+N+Sg+Abe:  saˊjettáá
    saje+N+Ess:  saijeen
    saje+N+Par:  saijeed
    saje+N+Pl+Nom:  saˊjeh
    saje+N+Pl+Gen:  [soojij, soˊjij]
    saje+N+Pl+Acc:  soojijd
    saje+N+Pl+Ill:  [soojijd, soijijd] # MM: j säänist máhđulávt
    saje+N+Pl+Loc:  soojijn
    saje+N+Pl+Com:  soˊjijguin
    saje+N+Pl+Abe:  soˊjijttáá

  Noun - mane: # ok NJUNE
    mane+N+Sg+Nom:  maˊṇe
    mane+N+Sg+Gen:  maˊne
    mane+N+Sg+Acc:  maˊne
    mane+N+Sg+Ill:  maˊṇan
    mane+N+Sg+Loc:  maaneest
    mane+N+Sg+Com:  moonijn # MM
    mane+N+Sg+Abe:  maˊnettáá
    mane+N+Ess:  manneen
    mane+N+Par:  manneed
    mane+N+Pl+Nom:  maˊneh
    mane+N+Pl+Gen:  [moonij, moˊnij]
    mane+N+Pl+Acc:  moonijd
    mane+N+Pl+Ill:  moonijd # MM
    mane+N+Pl+Loc:  moonijn
    mane+N+Pl+Com:  moˊnijguin
    mane+N+Pl+Abe:  moˊnijttáá

  Noun - kove: # ok NJUNE
    kove+N+Sg+Nom:  koˊṿe 
    kove+N+Sg+Gen:  koˊve
    kove+N+Sg+Acc:  koˊve
    kove+N+Sg+Ill:  koˊṿán
    kove+N+Sg+Loc:  kooveest
    kove+N+Sg+Com:  [kuvvijn, kuuvijn] # MM & MLO kuvvijn; ILWB IV kuuvijn
    kove+N+Sg+Abe:  koˊvettáá
    kove+N+Ess:   kovveen
    kove+N+Par:  kovveed
    kove+N+Pl+Nom:  koˊveh
    kove+N+Pl+Gen:  [kuuvij, kuˊvij]
    kove+N+Pl+Acc:  kuuvijd
    kove+N+Pl+Ill:  [kuuvijd, kuvvijd] # MM, MLO & ILWB; MM iäpádâs - ill. kuhheeb om Vuoli Ilmarist
    kove+N+Pl+Loc:  kuuvijn
    kove+N+Pl+Com:  kuˊvijguin
    kove+N+Pl+Abe:  kuˊvijttáá

  Noun - njune: # ok NJUNE
    njune+N+Sg+Nom:  njuˊṇe
    njune+N+Sg+Gen:  njuˊne
    njune+N+Sg+Acc:  njuˊne
    njune+N+Sg+Ill:  njuˊṇán
    njune+N+Sg+Loc:  njuuneest
    njune+N+Sg+Com:   [njuunijn, njunnijn] #MM
    njune+N+Sg+Abe:  njuˊnettáá
    njune+N+Ess:  njunneen
    njune+N+Par:  njunneed
    njune+N+Pl+Nom:  njuˊneh
    njune+N+Pl+Gen:  [njuunij, njuˊnij]
    njune+N+Pl+Acc:  njuunijd
    njune+N+Pl+Ill:  njuunijd 
    njune+N+Pl+Loc:  njuunijn
    njune+N+Pl+Com:  njuˊnijguin
    njune+N+Pl+Abe:  njuˊnijttáá

  Noun - lope: # ok NJUNE
    lope+N+Sg+Nom:  loˊpe
    lope+N+Sg+Gen:  loˊve
    lope+N+Sg+Acc:  loˊve
    lope+N+Sg+Ill:  loˊpán
    lope+N+Sg+Loc:  looveest
    lope+N+Sg+Com:  [luuvijn, luvvijn]
    lope+N+Sg+Abe:  loˊvettáá
    lope+N+Ess:  loppeen
    lope+N+Par:  loppeed
    lope+N+Pl+Nom:  loˊveh
    lope+N+Pl+Gen:  [luuvij, luˊvij]
    lope+N+Pl+Acc:  luuvijd
    lope+N+Pl+Ill:  [luvvijd, luuvijd]
    lope+N+Pl+Loc:  luuvijn
    lope+N+Pl+Com:  luˊvijguin
    lope+N+Pl+Abe:  luˊvijttáá

  Noun - kope: # ok NJUNE
    kope+N+Sg+Nom:  koˊpe
    kope+N+Sg+Gen:  koˊve
    kope+N+Sg+Acc:  koˊve
    kope+N+Sg+Ill:  koˊpán
    kope+N+Sg+Loc:  kooveest
    kope+N+Sg+Com:  [kuvvijn, kuuvijn]
    kope+N+Sg+Abe:  koˊvettáá
    kope+N+Ess:  koppeen
    kope+N+Par:  koppeed
    kope+N+Pl+Nom:  koˊveh
    kope+N+Pl+Gen:  [kuuvij, kuˊvij]
    kope+N+Pl+Acc:  kuuvijd
    kope+N+Pl+Ill:  kuvvijd
    kope+N+Pl+Loc:  kuuvijn
    kope+N+Pl+Com:  kuˊvijguin
    kope+N+Pl+Abe:  kuˊvijttáá

  Noun - tupe: # ok NJUNE
    tupe+N+Sg+Nom:  tuˊpe
    tupe+N+Sg+Gen:  tuˊve
    tupe+N+Sg+Acc:  tuˊve
    tupe+N+Sg+Ill:  tuˊpán
    tupe+N+Sg+Loc:  tuuveest
    tupe+N+Sg+Com:  [tuuvijn, tuvvijn]
    tupe+N+Sg+Abe:  tuˊvettáá
    tupe+N+Ess:  tuppeen
    tupe+N+Par:  tuppeed
    tupe+N+Pl+Nom:  tuˊveh
    tupe+N+Pl+Gen:  [tuuvij, tuˊvij]
    tupe+N+Pl+Acc:  tuuvijd
    tupe+N+Pl+Ill:  [tuuvijd, tuvvijd]
    tupe+N+Pl+Loc:  tuuvijn
    tupe+N+Pl+Com:  tuˊvijguin
    tupe+N+Pl+Abe:  tuˊvijttáá

  Noun - supe: # ok NJUNE
    supe+N+Sg+Nom:  suˊpe
    supe+N+Sg+Gen:  suˊve
    supe+N+Sg+Acc:  suˊve
    supe+N+Sg+Ill:  suˊpán
    supe+N+Sg+Loc:  suuveest
    supe+N+Sg+Com:  suvvijn
    supe+N+Sg+Abe:  suˊvettáá
    supe+N+Ess:  suppeen
    supe+N+Par:  suppeed
    supe+N+Pl+Nom:  suˊveh
    supe+N+Pl+Gen:  [suuvij, suˊvij]
    supe+N+Pl+Acc:  suuvijd
    supe+N+Pl+Ill:  [suuvijd, suvvijd]
    supe+N+Pl+Loc:  suuvijn
    supe+N+Pl+Com:  suˊvijguin
    supe+N+Pl+Abe:  suˊvijttáá

  Noun - njihe: # ok NJUNE
    njihe+N+Sg+Nom:  njiˊhe
    njihe+N+Sg+Gen:  njiˊṿe
    njihe+N+Sg+Acc:  njiˊṿe
    njihe+N+Sg+Ill:  njiˊhán
    njihe+N+Sg+Loc:  njivveest
    njihe+N+Sg+Com:  njivvijn
    njihe+N+Sg+Abe:  njiˊṿettáá
    njihe+N+Ess:  njihheen
    njihe+N+Par:  njihheed
    njihe+N+Pl+Nom:  njiˊṿeh
    njihe+N+Pl+Gen:  [njiiṿij, njiˊṿij]
    njihe+N+Pl+Acc:  njiiṿijd
    njihe+N+Pl+Ill:  [njiiṿijd, njivvijd]
    njihe+N+Pl+Loc:  njiiṿijn
    njihe+N+Pl+Com:  njiˊṿijguin
    njihe+N+Pl+Abe:  njiˊṿijttáá
    
  Noun - mote: # ok NJUNE
    mote+N+Sg+Nom:  moˊte
    mote+N+Sg+Gen:  moˊđe
    mote+N+Sg+Acc:  moˊđe
    mote+N+Sg+Ill:  moˊtán
    mote+N+Sg+Loc:  moođeest
    mote+N+Sg+Com:  muuđijn
    mote+N+Sg+Abe:  moˊđettáá
    mote+N+Ess:  motteen
    mote+N+Par:  motteed
    mote+N+Pl+Nom:  moˊđeh
    mote+N+Pl+Gen:  [muuđij, muˊđij]
    mote+N+Pl+Acc:  muuđijd
    mote+N+Pl+Ill:  muuđijd
    mote+N+Pl+Loc:  muuđijn
    mote+N+Pl+Com:  muˊđijguin
    mote+N+Pl+Abe:  muˊđijttáá    
